Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-402
Clerk; liability for acts of deputy.

Every clerk appointing a deputy under the provisions of section 24-401 shall be liable for all the official acts of said deputy clerk.

Laws 1879, § 44, p. 92;

R.S.1913, § 1195;

C.S.1922, § 1118;

C.S.1929, § 27-402;

R.S.1943, § 24-402.